regression_test_data/sort/expected_output/mon.dix
<?xml version="1.0" encoding="UTF-8"?>
<!--
	Dictionary:
	Sections: 1
	Entries: 16
	Sdefs: 26
	Paradigms: 7
	Last processed by: apertium-dixtools sort -mon ../../test/sample.metadix actual_output/mon.dix

-->
<dictionary>
	<alphabet>·ÀÁÂÄÇÈÉÊËÌÍÎÏÑÒÓÔÖÙÚÛÜàáâäçèéêëìíîïñòóôöùúûüABCDEFGHIJKLMNOPQRSTUVWXYZabcdefghijklmnopqrstuvwxyz</alphabet>
	<sdefs>
		<sdef n="adj" /> 
		<sdef n="adv" /> 
		<sdef n="def" /> 
		<sdef n="det" /> 
		<sdef n="f" /> 
		<sdef n="gen" /> 
		<sdef n="ger" /> 
		<sdef n="ind" /> 
		<sdef n="m" /> 
		<sdef n="mf" /> 
		<sdef n="n" /> 
		<sdef n="nn" /> 
		<sdef n="np" /> 
		<sdef n="nt" /> 
		<sdef n="p1" /> 
		<sdef n="p2" /> 
		<sdef n="p3" /> 
		<sdef n="pr" /> 
		<sdef n="prn" /> 
		<sdef n="rpar" /> 
		<sdef n="sg" /> 
		<sdef n="sp" /> 
		<sdef n="tn" /> 
		<sdef n="vaux" /> 
		<sdef n="vblex" /> 
		<sdef n="ND" /> 
	</sdefs>
	<pardefs>
    <!-- comment before pardef -->
		<pardef n="S__encimp">
    <!-- comment before e -->
		<e>
    <!-- comment before p -->
			<p>
				<l>-en</l>
				<r>en<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="adv"/></r>
			</p>
		</e><!-- comment after e -->   

		<e>
			<p>
				<l>-la</l>
				<r>le<s n="prn"/><s n="enc"/><s n="p3"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		</pardef>

		<pardef n="achèt/e__vblex"><!-- commentzzz on same line, just after pardef tag start -->
		<e>
			<p>
				<l>e</l>
				<r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		<e>
			<p>
				<l>e</l>
				<r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			</p>
				<par n="S__encimp"/> 
		</e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="achet/er__vblex">
		<e>
			<p>
				<l>a</l>
				<r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		<e>
			<p>
				<l>ai</l>
				<r>er<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="luî/mes__vblex">
		<e r="LR">
			<p>
				<l>mes</l>
				<r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		<e r="LR">
			<p>
				<l>tes</l>
				<r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="lui/re__vblex">
		<e r="LR">
			<p>
				<l>rent</l>
				<r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		<e r="LR">
			<p>
				<l>s</l>
				<r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		<e r="LR">
			<p>
				<l>s</l>
				<r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="ifi"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
			</p>
		</e>

		<e>
			<p>
				<l>s</l>
				<r>re<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r>
			</p>
				<par n="S__encimp"/> 
		</e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="ach/e[T]er__vblex">
		<e>
			<p>
				<l><prm/>è</l>
				<r>e<prm/></r>
			</p>
				<par n="achèt/e__vblex"/> 
		</e>

		<e>
				<i>e<prm/></i>
				<par n="achet/er__vblex"/> 
		</e>

		</pardef>
		<pardef n="lu/i[]re__vblex">
		<e>
			<p>
				<l><prm1/>î</l>
				<r>i<prm2/></r>
			</p>
				<i><prm/></i>
				<par n="luî/mes__vblex"/> 
		</e>

		<e>
				<i>i<prm3/></i>
				<par n="lui/re__vblex"/> 
		</e>

		</pardef>
	</pardefs>

	<section id="main" type="standard">
		<!-- ******************************
			    group vblex
			****************************** -->
		<e lm="acheter">
				<i>ach</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="acheter">
				<i>ach</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="comment">
				<i>ach</i>
				<par n="comach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/> 
		</e><!-- bla bla -->

		<e lm="acheter">
				<i>ach</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="t"/> 
		</e>



    <!-- ======== IMPORTANT ============
      When editing this file, please be EXTREMELY CAREFUL about following the existing format.
      The reason is: This file is run through and re-formatted by the dixtools and saved by
      new DicFormatE1LineAligned(dic).printXML("tmp_test.xml") and compared to itself.
      Any substantial difference will make the unit tests FAIL. Jacob Nordfalk 3 dec 2008.
      ================================== -->
      

    <!-- Verbs -->
		<e lm="amener">
				<i>am</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="n"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="amener">
				<i>am</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="n"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="amener" alt="val">
				<i>am</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="n"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="noncomment">
				<i>am</i>
				<par n="noncomach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="n"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="détruire">
				<i>détru</i>
				<par n="lu/i[]re__vblex" prm="" prm2="A" prm3="B" prm4="C"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="détruire">
				<i>détru</i>
				<par n="lu/i[]re__vblex" prm="" prm2="A" prm3="B" prm4="C"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="détruire" alt="val">
				<i>détru</i>
				<par n="lu/i[]re__vblex" prm="" prm2="A" prm3="B" prm4="C"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="détruire">
				<i>détru</i>
				<par n="lu/i[]re__vblex" prm="" prm2="A" prm3="B" prm4="C"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="enlever">
				<i>enl</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="v"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="enlever">
				<i>enl</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="v"/> 
		</e>

		<e lm="enlever" alt="val">
				<i>enl</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="v"/> 
		</e>



    <!-- Verbs // Multiwords -->
    <!-- formatting of Multiwords is NOT ready yet.
    <e lm="amener cats">
      <i>am</i>
      <par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="n"/>
      <p>
        <l><b/>cats</l>
        <r><g><b/>cats</g></r>
      </p>
    </e>

    <e lm="ameber dogs">
      <i>am</i>
      <par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="b"/>
      <p>
        <l><b/>dogs</l>
        <r><g><b/>dogs</g></r>
      </p>
    </e>
-->
		<e lm="enlever">
				<i>enl</i>
				<par n="ach/e[T]er__vblex" prm="v"/> 
		</e>

	</section>
</dictionary>
